California, session 20252026, SB424.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.54 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.54. This division does not apply to a project that meets all of the following criteria:(a) The project is developed solely to serve an urgent public health or housing need as established by federal or state policy on less than 15 acres in an urbanized area.(b) The project is within the boundaries of an expired regional habitat conservation plan.(c) An environmental review for the project was completed consistent with the requirements of the regional habitat conservation plan as the plan existed before the plan’s expiration. SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21000.The Legislature finds and declares as follows:(a)The maintenance of a quality environment for the people of this state now and in the future is a matter of statewide concern.(b)It is necessary to provide a high-quality environment that at all times is healthful and pleasing to the senses and intellect of people.(c)There is a need to understand the relationship between the maintenance of high-quality ecological systems and the general welfare of the people of the state, including their enjoyment of the natural resources of the state.(d)The capacity of the environment is limited, and it is the intent of the Legislature that the government of the state take immediate steps to identify critical thresholds for the health and safety of the people of the state and take all coordinated actions necessary to prevent those thresholds being reached.(e)Every citizen has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and enhancement of the environment.(f)The interrelationship of policies and practices in the management of natural resources and waste disposal requires systematic and concerted efforts by public and private interests to enhance environmental quality and to control environmental pollution.(g)It is the intent of the Legislature that all agencies of the state government that regulate activities of private individuals, corporations, and public agencies that are found to affect the quality of the environment shall regulate those activities so that major consideration is given to preventing environmental damage, while providing a decent home and satisfying living environment for all Californians.